orig/quantLexcErz.lexc
! -*- utf-8-unix -*-
Multichar_Symbols

ZERO
%0

! tags
+NCrd
+NOrd
+Dig1
+Dig2
+Dig3
+Dig4
+Rom !Roman numerals




+1Sg
+1SgM
+1SgN
+2Sg
+3Sg
+1Pl
+2Pl
+3Pl
+1Pl-1Pl ! reciprocal values
+3Pl-3Pl ! reciprocal values
+1
+2
+Abe
+Abl
+Acronym
+Anthroponym
+Ad-A
+Adverbial
+Approx
+Capitalizing
+Clit
+Coll
+Com
+Comp
+Cond
+Conj
+Conjunction
+Conneg !:^К3
+Dat
+Deriv
+Dial
+Des
+Det
+Deverbal
+DimKE
+DimNE
+Ela
+Familiar
+First
+FirstF
+FirstM
+Gen
+Ill
+Imp
+Ind
+Indet
+Ine
+KLoss
+LastF
+LastM
+Loc
+Multip
+MVme !Main verb "mo" vs "me"
+mOInf
+msInf
+mstOInf
+mgaInf
+mdOInf
+Neg
+NoClitic
+Nom
+NomGen
+NonNomSg
+NoNum ! No number
+NoPossPx
+NoPredx
+Noun
+Noun2
+NoVowX !No linking with suffix. Alternates with +VowX cf. install binary
+NConsStem
+Num
+NVowStem
+Obj
+OldOrth
+Opt
+Ord
+Particle
+PastPrt
+PatronymF
+PatronymM
+Phonematic
+Pl
+Poss
+Pred
+Pres
+PresPrtLong !:^Ы2ця Nouns1 
+PresPrtMedium !:^Ы2й Nouns1 
+PresPrtShort !:^Ы2 Nouns1 
+PretI
+PretII
+Prol
+Pronoun
+Proper
+Prt !Participle
+Q !
+Quant !cf. +Num >> +Q
+Recip ! Reciprocal
+Sandhi
+Sg
+Spatial
+Subj
+Symbl
+Temporal
+Temp
+Toponym
+TLoss
+Transl
+V2Nma !Deverbal Noun in "mo" and "ma"
+Verb
+VLoss
+VoicingCons
+VowX !alternates with +NoVowX





! verbal stem vowels
У1
И1
Ы1

! Nominal stem vowels that alternate 
У2
И2

У3
И3
Ы3

! Nominal stem vowel following vowel, word finally realized as "й"
!И4

!Suffix final variant vowel for hard vs soft
У4


! verbal stem consonant that appear in PretI 3sg
Т1

! derivational suffix protovowel with "o" and "a" 
!realisation  in deverbal noun ending
А1

! conjugational suffix protovowels 
!showing "a" vs "я" and "ы" vs "и" alternation
А2
Ы2

! derivational suffix protovowel  
О1

! clitic proto consonant
Г1

! Prolative
Г2

! imperative suffix
К1

! connegative suffix rendering consonant
К2

! connegative suffix rendering vowel
К3

! Some verbs need a marker for vowel placement
V1
VLoss
NoVLoss


@P.KLOSS.ON@
@R.KLOSS.ON@
@C.KLOSS@

@P.TLOSS.ON@
@R.TLOSS.ON@
@C.TLOSS@



!Dealing with numerals up to 4 digits long
LEXICON Numerals
№+Symbl:№ # ;
I Roman-numerals ; !
II Roman-numerals ;
III Roman-numerals ;
IV Roman-numerals ;
V Roman-numerals ;
VI Roman-numerals ;
VII Roman-numerals ;
VIII Roman-numerals ;
IX Roman-numerals ;
X Roman-numerals ;
XI Roman-numerals ;
XII Roman-numerals ;
XIII Roman-numerals ;
XIV Roman-numerals ;
XV Roman-numerals ;
XVI Roman-numerals ;
XVII Roman-numerals ;
XVIII Roman-numerals ;
XIX Roman-numerals ;
XX Roman-numerals ;
D Roman-numerals ;
C Roman-numerals ;
L Roman-numerals ;
M Roman-numerals ;

1 Num-1a ;
2 Num-1a ;
3 Num-1a ;
4 Num-1a ;
5 Num-1a ;
6 Num-1a ;
7 Num-1a ;
8 Num-1a ;
9 Num-1a ;

LEXICON Num-1a
+Dig1: Num-1d ;

1 Num-1b ;
2 Num-1b ;
3 Num-1b ;
4 Num-1b ;
5 Num-1b ;
6 Num-1b ;
7 Num-1b ;
8 Num-1b ;
9 Num-1b ;
ZERO Num-1b ;


LEXICON Num-1b
+Dig2: Num-1d ;
1 Num-1c ;
2 Num-1c ;
3 Num-1c ;
4 Num-1c ;
5 Num-1c ;
6 Num-1c ;
7 Num-1c ;
8 Num-1c ;
9 Num-1c ;
ZERO Num-1c ;


LEXICON Num-1c
+Dig3: Num-1d ;
+Dig4:1 Num-1d ;
+Dig4:2 Num-1d ;
+Dig4:3 Num-1d ;
+Dig4:4 Num-1d ;
+Dig4:5 Num-1d ;
+Dig4:6 Num-1d ;
+Dig4:7 Num-1d ;
+Dig4:8 Num-1d ;
+Dig4:9 Num-1d ;
+Dig4:ZERO Num-1d ;


LEXICON Num-1d
+NOrd:-це # ;
+NCrd: # ;

!!Roman Numerals
LEXICON Roman-numerals
+Rom: # ; 


!!!Now regular



LEXICON Quants1
 Quants2 ;
+Ord:^це Quants3 ;
+Ord+LV:^V1це Quants3 ;

LEXICON Quants2
 Quants3 ;
< %+Coll:0 %+Attr:0 н с т  "@P.TLOSS.ON@">  Quants3 ;
< %+Coll:0 н е к "@P.KLOSS.ON@"> Clitics ;
< %+Approx:0 %+Coll:0 ш к а н е к  "@P.KLOSS.ON@"> Clitics ;
+Coll:^не Possessives2-Ill ;
+Approx+Coll:^шкане Possessives2-Ill ;
+Coll:^не Possessives2 ;
+Multip:^ксть Clitics ;
+LV+Multip:^V1ксть Clitics ;
+Approx+Multip:^шкаксть Clitics ;
+LV+Approx+Multip:^V1шкаксть Clitics ;

LEXICON Quants3
!Cx PossPx Tx PredPx Clitic
!Cases1 Possessives1 Tenses1 PredPersons1 Clitics
+Indet+Sg+Nom: Tenses1 ;
+VowX+Sg+Nom+Poss+3Sg:^V1зО1 Tenses1 ;
+NoVowX+Sg+Nom+Poss+3Sg:^зО1 Tenses1 ;
+VowX+Indet+Lat:^V1в Clitics ;
+NoVowX+Indet+Lat:^в Clitics ;


+NoVowX+NoNum+NomGen+Poss+1Sgm:^м Tenses1 ;
+NoVowX+NoNum+NonNomSg+Poss+1SgN:^нУ4 Tenses1 ;
+NoVowX+NoNum+NomGen+Poss+2Sg:^тУ4 Tenses1 ;
+NoVowX+NoNum+NonNomSg+Poss+3Sg:^нзО1 Tenses1 ;
< 0:%^ 0:н 0:О1 0:к %+NoVowX:0 %+NoNum:0 %+NomGen:0 %+Poss:0 %+1Pl:0 "@P.KLOSS.ON@"> Tenses1 ;
< 0:%^ 0:н 0:к %+NoVowX:0 %+NoNum:0 %+NomGen:0 %+Poss:0 %+2Pl:0  "@P.KLOSS.ON@"> Tenses1 ;
< 0:%^ 0:с 0:т %+NoVowX:0 %+NoNum:0 %+NomGen:0 %+Poss:0 %+3Pl:0 "@P.TLOSS.ON@"> Tenses1 ;
+VowX+NoNum+NomGen+Poss+1Sgm:^V1м Tenses1 ;
+VowX+NoNum+NonNomSg+Poss+1SgN:^V1нУ4 Tenses1 ;
+VowX+NoNum+NomGen+Poss+2Sg:^V1тУ4 Tenses1 ;
+VowX+NoNum+NonNomSg+Poss+3Sg:^V1нзО1 Tenses1 ;
< 0:%^ 0:V1 0:н 0:О1 0:к %+VowX:0 %+NoNum:0 %+NomGen:0 %+Poss:0 %+1Pl:0  "@P.KLOSS.ON@"> Tenses1 ;
< 0:%^ 0:V1 0:н 0:к %+VowX:0 %+NoNum:0 %+NomGen:0 %+Poss:0 %+2Pl:0 "@P.KLOSS.ON@"> Tenses1 ;
< 0:%^ 0:V1 0:с 0:т %+VowX:0 %+NoNum:0 %+NomGen:0 %+Poss:0 %+3Pl:0 "@P.TLOSS.ON@"> Tenses1 ;




+NoVowX+Det+Sg+Nom:^сь Tenses1 ;
+VowX+Det+Sg+Nom:^V1сь Tenses1 ;
+NoVowX+Det+Sg+Gen:^нть Clitics ;
+NoVowX+Det+Sg+Dat:^нтень Clitics ;
+VowX+Det+Sg+Gen:^V1нть Clitics ;
+VowX+Det+Sg+Dat:^V1нтень Clitics ;
+NoVowX+Ill:^зО1 Possessives2 ;
+VowX+Ill:^V1зО1 Possessives2 ;

+VLoss+Indet+Pl:^VLossтУ4 Tenses1 ;
+Indet+Pl:^NoVLossтУ4 Tenses1 ;
+Det+Pl:^тне Tenses1 ;

+Abl:^дО1 Possessives1 ;
+LV+Abl:^V1дО1 Possessives1 ;
+NoVowX+Gen:^нь Tenses1 ;
+Dat:^нень Clitics ;
+NoVowX+Ill:^с Clitics ;
+VowX+Gen:^V1нь Tenses1 ;
+VowX+Ill:^V1с Clitics ;

+Prol+Det+Sg:^Г2а^нть Clitics ;
+Abe+Det+Sg:^втО1мО1^нть Clitics ;
+Abl+Det+Sg:^дО1^нть Clitics ;
+NoVowX+Transl+Det+Sg:^ксУ4^нть Clitics ;
+NoVowX+Ine+Det+Sg:^сО1^нть Clitics ;
+NoVowX+Ela+Det+Sg:^стО1^нть Clitics ;
+NoVowX+Comp+Det+Sg:^шка^нть Clitics ;
+VowX+Transl+Det+Sg:^V1ксУ4^нть Clitics ;
+VowX+Ine+Det+Sg:^V1сО1^нть Clitics ;
+VowX+Ela+Det+Sg:^V1стО1^нть Clitics ;
+VowX+Comp+Det+Sg:^V1шка^нть Clitics ;
+Det+Pl+Abl:^тне^де Clitics ;
+Det+Pl+Gen:^тне^нь Clitics ;
+Det+Pl+Dat:^тне^нень Clitics ;
+Det+Pl+Ill:^тне^с Clitics ;

+Prol:^Г2а Possessives1 ;
+Abe:^втО1мО1 Possessives1 ;
+NoVowX+Transl:^кс Possessives1 ;
+NoVowX+Ine:^сО1 Possessives1 ;
+NoVowX+Ela:^стО1 Possessives1 ;
+NoVowX+Comp:^шка Possessives1 ;
+NoVowX+Comp+Com:^шкане Possessives1 ;
+VowX+Transl:^V1кс Possessives1 ;
+VowX+Ine:^V1сО1 Possessives1 ;
+VowX+Ela:^V1стО1 Possessives1 ;
+VowX+Comp:^V1шка Possessives1 ;
+VowX+Comp+Com:^V1шкане Possessives1 ;

+Det+Pl+Prol:^тне^ва Tenses1 ;
+Det+Pl+Abe:^тне^втеме Tenses1 ;
+Det+Pl+Transl:^тне^ксЫ3 Clitics ;
+Det+Pl+Ine:^тне^сэ Tenses1 ;
+Det+Pl+Ela:^тне^стэ Tenses1 ;
+Det+Pl+Comp:^тне^шка Tenses1 ;

!Attributes
+Prol:^Г2а Attributes2 ; 
+Abe:^втО1мО1 Attributes2 ;  
+NoVowX+Transl:^кс Attributes2 ;
+NoVowX+Ine:^сО1 Attributes2 ;  
+NoVowX+Ela:^стО1 Attributes2 ;  
+NoVowX+Comp:^шка Attributes2 ;  
+VowX+Transl:^V1кс Attributes2 ;
+VowX+Ine:^V1сО1 Attributes2 ; 
+VowX+Ela:^V1стО1 Attributes2 ;
+VowX+Comp:^V1шка Attributes2 ;
+Det+Pl+Prol:^тне^ва Attributes2 ; 
+Det+Pl+Abe:^тне^втеме Attributes2 ; 
+Det+Pl+Transl:^тне^ксЫ3 Attributes2 ; 
+Det+Pl+Ine:^тне^сэ Attributes2 ; 
+Det+Pl+Ela:^тне^стэ Attributes2 ;
+Det+Pl+Comp:^тне^шка Attributes2 ; 
< %+TLoss:0 "@R.TLOSS.ON@"> Quants3_TLOSS ;

LEXICON Root
вейке+Num:вейке Quants2 ;
вейте+Old+Num:вейтИ2 Quants2 ;
кавто+Num:кавто Quants1 ;
колмо+Num:колмо Quants1 ;
ниле+Num:ниле Quants1 ;
вете+Num:вете Quants1 ;
кото+Num:кото Quants1 ;
сисем+Num+NConsStem:сисемИ3 Quants1 ;
кавксо+Num:кавксо Quants1 ;
вейксэ+Num:вейксэ Quants1 ;
кемень+Num+NConsStem:кеменИ3 Quants1 ;
кевейкее+Num:кевейкее Quants1 ;
кемгавтово+Num:кемгавтово Quants1 ;
кемголмово+Num:кемголмово Quants1 ;
кемнилее+Num:кемнилее Quants1 ;
кеветее+Num:кеветее Quants1 ;
кемготово+Num:кемготово Quants1 ;
кемзисемге+Num:кемзисемге Quants1 ;
кемгавксово+Num:кемгавксово Quants1 ;
кевейксэе+Num:кевейксэе Quants1 ;
кемвейкее+Num+Phonematic:кемвейкее Quants1 ;
кемкавтово+Num+Phonematic:кемкавтово Quants1 ;
кемколмово+Num+Phonematic:кемколмово Quants1 ;
кемнилее+Num+Phonematic:кемнилее Quants1 ;
кемветее+Num+Phonematic:кемветее Quants1 ;
кемкотово+Num+Phonematic:кемкотово Quants1 ;
кемсисемге+Num+Phonematic:кемсисемге Quants1 ;
кемкавксово+Num+Phonematic:кемкавксово Quants1 ;
кемвейксэе+Num+Phonematic:кемвейксэе Quants1 ;
комсь+Num+NConsStem:комсь Quants1 ;
комсьвейкее+Num:комсьвейкее Quants1 ;
комськавтово+Num:комськавтово Quants1 ;
комськолмово+Num:комськолмово Quants1 ;
комсьнилее+Num:комсьнилее Quants1 ;
комсьветее+Num:комсьветее Quants1 ;
комськотово+Num:комськотово Quants1 ;
комсьсисемге+Num:комсьсисемге Quants1 ;
комськавксово+Num:комськавксово Quants1 ;
комсьвейксэе+Num:комсьвейксэе Quants1 ;
колоньгемень+Num+NConsStem:колоньгеменИ3 Quants1 ;
колмонькемень+Num+Phonematic+NConsStem:колмонькеменИ3 Quants1 ;
ниленьгемень+Num+NConsStem:ниленьгеменИ3 Quants1 ;
ниленькемень+Num+Phonematic+NConsStem:ниленькеменИ3 Quants1 ;
ведьгемень+Num+NConsStem:ведьгеменИ3 Quants1 ;
кодгемень+Num+NConsStem:кодгеменИ3 Quants1 ;
ветенькемень+Num+Phonematic+NConsStem:ветенькеменИ3 Quants1 ;
котонькемень+Num+Phonematic+NConsStem:котонькеменИ3 Quants1 ;
сизьгемень+Num+NConsStem:сизьгеменИ3 Quants1 ;
кавксоньгемень+Num+NConsStem:кавксоньгеменИ3 Quants1 ;
вейксэньгемень+Num+NConsStem:вейксэньгеменИ3 Quants1 ;
сизькемень+Num+Phonematic+NConsStem:сизьгеменИ3 Quants1 ;
кавксонькемень+Num+Phonematic+NConsStem:кавксоньгеменИ3 Quants1 ;
вейксэнькемень+Num+Phonematic+NConsStem:вейксэньгеменИ3 Quants1 ;
сядо+Num+NMixedStem:сядУ2 Quants1 ;
пельсядо+Num+NMixedStem:пельсядУ2 Quants1 ;
кавтосядт+Num+NMixedStem:кавтосядУ2 Quants1 ;
колмосядт+Num+NMixedStem:колмосядУ2 Quants1 ;
нилесядт+Num+NMixedStem:нилесядУ2 Quants1 ;
ветесядт+Num+NMixedStem:ветесядУ2 Quants1 ;
котосядт+Num+NMixedStem:котосядУ2 Quants1 ;
сисемсядт+Num+Phonematic+NMixedStem:сисемсядУ2 Quants1 ;
сисемзядт+Num+NMixedStem:сисемзядУ2 Quants1 ;
кавксосядт+Num+NMixedStem:кавксосядУ2 Quants1 ;
вейксэсядт+Num+NMixedStem:вейксэсядУ2 Quants1 ;
тёжа+Num:тёжа Quants1 ;
миллион+Num+NConsStem:миллионУ3 Quants1 ;
эрьва+Pron+Q:эрьва Quants1 ;
зяро+Pron+Q:зяро Quants1 ;
зярыя+Pron+Q:зярыя Quants1 ;
зняро+Pron+Q:зняро Quants1 ;
знярыя+Pron+Q:знярыя Quants1 ;
ламо+Pron+Q:ламо Quants2 ;
аламо+Pron+Q:аламо Quants2 ;
аламне+Pron+Q+DimNE:аламне Quants2 ;
васенце+Q:васенце Quants3 ;
омбоце+Q:омбоце Quants3 ;
кавонст+Num+Coll+Attr+NConsStem:кавонстУ3 Quants3 ;
веенст+Num+Coll+Attr+NConsStem:веенстЫ3 Quants3 ;
омбонст+Num+Coll+Attr+NConsStem:омбонстУ3 Quants3 ;
